test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-hurskes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - hurskes: # 2A
    hu´rskes+N+Sg+Nom: hurskes
    hu´rskes+N+Sg+Gen: hurskás
    hu´rskes+N+Sg+Acc: hurskás
    hu´rskes+N+Sg+Ill: hurskásân
    hu´rskes+N+Sg+Loc: hurskásist
    hu´rskes+N+Sg+Com: hurskásáin
    hu´rskes+N+Sg+Abe: hurskásttáá
    hu´rskes+N+Ess:    hurskesin            #hurskásin
    hu´rskes+N+Par:    hurskesid            #hurskásid
    hu´rskes+N+Pl+Nom: hurskáseh
    hu´rskes+N+Pl+Gen: hurskásij
    hu´rskes+N+Pl+Acc: hurskásijd
    hu´rskes+N+Pl+Ill: hurskásáid
    hu´rskes+N+Pl+Loc: hurskásijn
    hu´rskes+N+Pl+Com: hurskásijguin
    hu´rskes+N+Pl+Abe: hurskásijttáá
